Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1204.01
Advanced emergency medical technician practice of emergency medical care, defined.

Advanced emergency medical technician practice of emergency medical care means care provided in accordance with the knowledge and skill acquired through successful completion of an approved program for an advanced emergency medical technician. Such care includes, but is not limited to, (1) all of the acts that an emergency medical technician is authorized to perform and (2) complex interventions, treatments, and pharmacological interventions.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 15.